Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-124
Simultaneous death of insured and beneficiary of insurance policy.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died and there is no sufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously, the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 4, p. 306.